New Jersey, session 221, A890.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No medical creditor shall report any portion of a medical debt which is alleged to be unpaid to any collection or credit reporting agency, bureau, or data collection facility. b.    As used in this section: "Health care provider" means an individual or entity which, acting within the scope of its licensure or certification, provides a health care service.  Health care provider includes, but is not limited to, a physician, dentist and other health care professionals licensed pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, and a hospital and other health care facilities licensed pursuant to Title 26 of the Revised Statutes. Medical creditor means any health care provider that provides health care services and to whom a consumer owes money for health care services, or any person who purchases a medical debt. Medical debt means a debt arising from the receipt of health care services. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day next following enactment.